Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.320

Law enforcement stand-by to recover possessions—Other than for extreme risk protection orders.

(1) When an order is issued under this chapter upon request of the petitioner, the court may order a law enforcement officer to accompany the petitioner and assist in placing the petitioner in possession of those items indicated in the order or to otherwise assist in the execution of the order of protection. The order must list all items that are to be included with sufficient specificity to make it clear which property is included. Orders issued under this chapter must include a designation of the appropriate law enforcement agency to execute, serve, or enforce the order. Any appropriate law enforcement agency should act where assistance is needed, even if the agency is not specifically named in the order, including assisting with the recovery of firearms as ordered.

(2) Upon order of a court, a law enforcement officer shall accompany the petitioner and assist in placing the petitioner in possession of all items listed in the order and to otherwise assist in the execution of the order.

(3) When the respondent is ordered to vacate the residence or other shared property, the respondent may be permitted by the court to remove personal clothing, personal items needed during the duration of the order, and any other items specified by the court, while a law enforcement officer is present.

(4) Where orders involve surrender of firearms, dangerous weapons, and concealed pistol licenses, those items must be secured and accounted for in a manner that prioritizes safety and compliance with court orders.

[ 2022 c 268 s 18; 2021 c 215 s 41.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.